Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1256.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 44-1527, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE44-1527. Failure to supply information or obey subpoena; hearing A. If any person fails or refuses to fully comply with a demand or any subpoena issued by the attorney general under sections section 44-1524 or 44-1526, the attorney general may file a petition with the superior court and, after notice and hearing on the petition, request the following orders until the person complies with the demand or the subpoena: 1. Adjudging such person in contempt of court. 2. Granting injunctive relief, restraining the sale or advertisement of merchandise by such person which is the subject of the investigation. 3. Granting such other relief as the court may deem proper. B. If the court determines that the attorney general has reasonable cause to believe that the respondent has engaged in, is engaging in or is about to engage in any act, practice or transaction which is in violation of this article or order or assurance of discontinuance entered under this article, the court shall grant the appropriate relief. C. If the attorney general determines that disclosure to the respondent of the evidence relied on to establish reasonable cause would not be in the best interests of the investigation, he the attorney general may request and the court may examine the evidence in camera and thereafter make its determination. END_STATUTE